Utah statutes.
48-1d-1041.   Conversion authorized.

(1)  By complying with Sections 48-1d-1041 through 48-1d-1046, a domestic partnership may become:

(a)  a domestic entity that is a different type of entity; or

(b)  a foreign entity that is a different type of entity, if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign jurisdiction.

(2)  By complying with the provisions of Sections 48-1d-1041 through 48-1d-1046 applicable to foreign entities, a foreign entity that is not a foreign partnership may become a domestic partnership if the conversion is authorized by the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

(3)  If a protected agreement contains a provision that applies to a merger of a domestic partnership but does not refer to a conversion, the provision applies to a conversion of the entity as if the conversion were a merger until the provision is amended after January 1, 2014.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

